Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-476
Drugs and devices; labeling requirements.

(1) In an assisted-living facility, a nursing facility, or a skilled nursing facility, all drugs and devices shall be labeled in accordance with currently accepted professional standards of care, including the appropriate accessory and cautionary instructions and the expiration date when applicable.

(2) If the dosage or directions for a specific drug or device to be used in an assisted-living facility, a nursing facility, or a skilled nursing facility are changed by a health care practitioner authorized to prescribe controlled substances and credentialed under the Uniform Credentialing Act, a pharmacist shall apply a new label as soon as practicable with the correct dosage or directions to the drug or device package or reissue the drug or device with the correct label. To protect the safety of the resident of such a facility receiving the drug or device until the drug or device can be correctly labeled, the drug or device package shall be temporarily flagged with a sticker indicating dose change, drug change, or MAR, to alert nursing staff or an unlicensed person responsible for providing the drug or device to a resident that the dosage or directions have changed and the drug or device is to be provided according to the corrected information contained in the resident's MAR, if one exists.

Laws 2020, LB1052, § 8.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.